Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Chapter 2 Annual Reports and License Taxes [Renumbered]

Revision of title. —

See note under same catchline following title 17 heading.

§§ 17-2-101 through 17-2-104.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered by Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

For present provisions, see §§

17-16-1630

and

17-16-1720

.